Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 6 Day-Care Centers for the Developmentally Disabled

Cross references.

Child, family, or group-care facility operators prohibited from employing or allowing to reside or be domiciled persons with certain past criminal violations, §

16-12-1.1

.

37-6-1.
Day-care center defined.

As used in this chapter, the term “day-care center” means any facility that is operated and maintained for and is qualified to furnish care and training to individuals with developmental disabilities on less than a 24 hour basis.

History.
Ga. L. 1963, p. 259, § 1; Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-18/HB 228.

37-6-2.
Participation by department in financing of day-care centers for developmentally disabled children.

The department is authorized, directed, and empowered to participate in the financing of public, nonprofit day-care centers for developmentally disabled children upon approval of such day-care centers under Code Section 37-6-6.

History.
Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-6-3.
Participation by department in financing of day-care centers generally.

The department is authorized, directed, and empowered to participate in the financing of day-care centers for developmentally disabled individuals that may be approved by the department in such municipalities and counties of this state. In carrying out
the authority and power set forth in this Code section the department is authorized, directed, and empowered to expend funds in assisting such day-care centers for developmentally disabled individuals in the operation of such centers.

History.
Ga. L. 1963, p. 259, § 3; Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-6-4.
Grants-in-aid to county boards of health for purchase of services from private day-care centers.

The department is authorized and empowered to make grants-in-aid to county boards of health to purchase care and training for developmentally disabled individuals from privately operated, nonprofit day-care centers provided these developmentally disabled
individuals have been certified as eligible for financial assistance.

History.
Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 3; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 17.6; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 18.1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “Nothing in this Act shall be construed to repeal any provision of Chapter 5 of Title 37 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, the ‘Community Services Act for the Mentally
Retarded.’ ”

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, § 19, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall become effective on July 1, 1994; provided, however, that provisions relating to the establishment of regional and community service board boundaries and the appointments
of regional boards and community service boards shall become effective on July 1, 1993, or upon whatever date is stipulated in the Act and provided, further, that the provisions authorizing a county board of health to agree to serve
as the lead county board of health for only that county shall become effective upon the approval of this Act by the Governor or upon its becoming law without such approval.” The Act was approved by the Governor on April 27, 1993.

Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which amends this Code section, provides, in § 19.1, not codified by the General Assembly, that the amendment is repealed on June 30, 1999; however, Ga. L. 1998, p. 870, § 1, struck § 19.1 of Ga. L. 1993, p. 1445, which would have
repealed the 1993 amendment to this Code section.

37-6-5.
Statements of operating costs.

The department may require any day-care center that receives state funds under Code Sections 37-6-2 and 37-6-4 to submit to the department at appropriate times certified statements of operating costs.

History.
Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, §§ 4, 8.

37-6-6.
Inspection and approval of day-care centers.

The department is authorized, directed, and empowered (1) to inspect day-care centers for the developmentally disabled in order to determine compliance with departmental standards for such centers and (2) to approve those day-care centers which meet minimum
departmental standards for matching funds under Code Section 37-6-2 or grants-in-aid under Code Section 37-6-4. Inspection shall include both those centers now in operation and those which will begin operation in the future. Reinspections
may be made at any time and approval may be withdrawn whenever circumstances indicate that a day-care center no longer meets departmental standards. If approval is withdrawn, it cannot be reinstated until the deficiencies have been
corrected and a satisfactory reinspection has been made. After a day-care center has been approved by the department and a certificate of approval has been issued, the center is not subject to examination, approval, or licensing by
any other department, agency, or division of the state.

History.
Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, §§ 5, 9; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-6-7.
Departmental standards for day-care centers.

The department is authorized, directed, and empowered:

To classify day-care centers; and

To prescribe and set out the kind and quality of buildings, equipment, facilities, and services which day-care centers shall maintain in order to give proper care and training to developmentally disabled individuals.

The board shall have the power to adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations for the establishment of standards which in its judgment are necessary to protect the health and lives of developmentally disabled individuals.

History.
Ga. L. 1963, p. 259, § 8; Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 10; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-6-8.
Expenditure of funds appropriated for this chapter.

The department is authorized, directed, and empowered to expend funds appropriated to the department for the purposes of administering this chapter.

History.
Ga. L. 1963, p. 259, § 7; Ga. L. 1966, p. 374, § 11.